Idaho, session 2026, H0491.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 5-330, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
5-330. IMMUNITY OF PERSONS GIVING EMERGENCY FIRST AID FROM DAMAGE
CLAIM. That no action shall lie or be maintained for civil damages in any
court of this state against any person or persons, or group of persons, who
in good faith and without compensation, being at, or stopping at the scene
of an accident or emergency, including a mental health or suicidal crisis,
offers and administers emergency first aid, or emergency medical attention,
or emergency psychological attention, including responding to suicidal
thoughts, to any person or persons injured in such accident or emergency
unless it can be shown that the person or persons offering or administering
emergency first aid, or emergency medical attention, or emergency psycho-
logical attention is guilty of gross negligence in the care or treatment of
said injured person or persons or has treated them in a grossly negligent
manner. The immunity described herein shall cease upon delivery of the in-
jured person to either a generally recognized hospital for treatment of ill
or injured persons, or upon assumption of treatment in the office or facility
of any person undertaking to treat said injured person or persons, or upon
delivery of said injured person or persons into custody of an ambulance at-
tendant.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.